Mississippi, session 2026, HB786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-19-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-63.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the privilege license tax levied by the provisions of this article shall be paid annually during the anniversary month of the acquisition of the vehicle.  The privilege license tax levied shall be based on a period of twelve (12) months, even though the actual time from the acquisition of the vehicle to the end of the anniversary month of the next succeeding year may be more than twelve (12) months.  Any person subject to the provisions of this article shall have an additional fifteen (15) days from the end of the anniversary month in which to purchase the tag and/or decals and to pay the privilege license tax without being in violation of this section.  Any person owning a vehicle subject to taxation under the provisions of this article who fails or refuses to pay such tax and obtain the privilege license required within the prescribed period of time shall be guilty of violating the provisions of this article, and shall be liable for the amount of such tax plus a penalty as provided for in this section.  If the person owning a vehicle subject to taxation under the provisions of this article does not operate such vehicle on the highways of this state from the date of acquisition or, if previously registered, from the end of the anniversary month of his tag and decals to the date on which he makes application for the privilege license, he shall pay such license tax for a period of twelve (12) months beginning with the first day of the month in which he applies for such privilege license.  The owner shall submit an affidavit with his application attesting to the fact that his vehicle was not operated on the highways of this state from the date of acquisition or, if previously registered, from the end of the anniversary month of his tag and decals to the date on which he makes application for the privilege license. (2)  Except as may be otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the privilege license tax levied by the provision of this article on operators of motor vehicles in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds, gross vehicle weight, apportioned vehicles, rental and commercial trailers and buses shall be due annually during the anniversary month which shall be established by the Commissioner of Revenue; however, there shall be an additional fifteen (15) days from the end of the anniversary month in which to file an application with the department and pay the privilege license tax.  The annual license tag and/or decals issued by the department for the license tax year shall be valid for a period of time to be determined by the * * *chairman Commissioner of Revenue but not to exceed fifteen (15) months following the anniversary month; provided, however, this does not extend the time for filing the application with the department and the payment of the license tax.  Any person who fails or refuses to pay such tax and obtain the privilege license required when due shall be guilty of violating the provision of this article and shall be liable for the entire amount of such tax from the date the liability was incurred, plus penalty as provided for in this section. (3)  The privilege license tax levied by the provisions of this article on operators of a motor vehicle that is in a corporate fleet or an individual fleet registered under Section 27-19-66, a trailer in a fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.1, or a motor vehicle that is in a rental fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.2 shall be due annually during the anniversary month which shall be established by the Commissioner of Revenue for corporate fleets, rental fleets and trailer fleets, and by the county tax collectors for individual fleets; however, there shall be an additional fifteen (15) days from the end of the anniversary month in which to file an application with the department or the county tax collector, as the case may be, and to purchase the tag or renew the registration of such motor vehicle and pay the privilege license tax.  The department or the county tax collector, as the case may be, shall issue a tag or renew the annual registration of such motor vehicle for the license tax year only after all ad valorem taxes and privilege taxes due on such motor vehicle have been paid. Any person who fails or refuses to pay the privilege tax and obtain the privilege license required when due shall be guilty of violating the provisions of this article and shall be liable for the entire amount of such tax from the date the liability was incurred, plus penalty as provided for in this section. If a motor vehicle registered in a rental fleet is removed from the fleet and the rental fleet license tag is removed from the motor vehicle and transferred to and used on another motor vehicle that is added to the fleet during the registration year to replace the removed motor vehicle, the remaining portion of privilege tax paid on the removed motor vehicle for the registration year shall be transferred to the replacement motor vehicle and there shall be no other privilege tax liability for the replacement motor vehicle for the remaining portion of the registration year. (4)  Penalties shall be assessed on the privilege license tax at the rate of five percent (5%) for the first fifteen (15) days of delinquency, or part thereof, and five percent (5%) for each additional thirty-day period of delinquency, or part thereof, not to exceed a maximum penalty of twenty-five percent (25%); however, a penalty of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), in addition to the maximum penalty for delinquency, shall be assessed against any person who is liable for the motor vehicle privilege license tax but who (a) displays an out-of-state license tag on the motor vehicle; or (b) displays a license tag or privilege license decal on the motor vehicle which was issued for another vehicle.  The department, for good reason shown, may waive all or any part of the penalties imposed.  No private passenger vehicle registered under this chapter shall have displayed on the front of such vehicle, or elsewhere, the official license tag of another state, whether or not such license tag has expired.  Law enforcement officers of this state may remove from private passenger vehicles any out-of-state license tags so displayed. (5)  The requirement that the privilege tax be paid during the anniversary month of each year shall not apply in the following cases: (a)  When a motor vehicle is acquired, the owner or operator of the vehicle purchased shall have thirty (30) full working days, exclusive of the date of delivery, after the vehicle has been delivered to him, within which to make the application for the required privilege license, otherwise such person shall be liable for penalty as provided for in this section.  Provided, however, that when any person shall acquire a vehicle as herein provided, and it shall be necessary that such vehicle be remodeled, changed or altered by such person before same is suitable for the purposes for which it was acquired, then such person shall have seven (7) full working days, exclusive of the day of the completion of such remodeling, change or alteration, after the completion thereof, or thirty (30) full working days, exclusive of the date of delivery, after the vehicle has been delivered to him, whichever is greater, within which to make application for the required privilege license; provided, that if such person fails to make application within such period, such person shall be liable for penalty as provided for in this section.  In addition, if the owner or operator of the purchased vehicle acquired the vehicle from a dealer and as part of the transaction of purchasing the vehicle he traded in a vehicle to the dealer, the person may retain the license plate removed from the traded vehicle and use the license plate on the vehicle purchased and registered if (i) the license plate is of the same series as that of a new license plate required for the vehicle that is purchased and to be registered, (ii) the license plate is authorized for use on the type of vehicle purchased and to be registered and (iii) the county in which the license plate was issued is the same as the county in which the purchased vehicle is to be registered. "Delivery" as used herein shall be construed to mean receipt of such vehicle by the purchaser thereof at his residence or place of business, and, in the event the vehicle is purchased at any place other than in the county of residence or place of business of such person, he shall be entitled to forty-eight (48) hours within which to transport such vehicle to the county of his residence or place of business.  At all times during such transportation, the owner or operator of such vehicle shall have in his possession a true bill of sale, giving the description of the vehicle, the name and address of the dealer from whom purchased, the name and address of the owner or operator, and the date on which the vehicle was acquired.  For failure to have such bill of sale in his possession during the entire time during which the vehicle is being transported, the owner or operator shall be liable for the annual privilege tax plus penalty as provided for in this section. (b)  Where a person has paid the current privilege license tax required by the laws of another state and applies for a privilege license in this state within thirty (30) days, no penalty shall be assessed; however, any person who fails to comply herewith shall be liable for the full annual tax, plus penalty as provided for in this section. (6)  Any nonresident of the State of Mississippi who has paid the current privilege license required by the laws of another state upon a private carrier of passengers, and thereafter becomes a resident of the State of Mississippi, or brings such vehicle into the State of Mississippi for use in connection with his business in this state, or who is gainfully employed in this state shall be entitled to operate such vehicle without obtaining a privilege license in this state for a period of not more than thirty (30) days. "Resident" for the purpose of registration and operation of motor vehicles shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  Any person, except a tourist or out-of-town student, who owns, leases or rents a place within the state and occupies same as a place of residence. (b)  Any person who engages in a trade, profession or occupation in this state or who accepts employment in other than seasonal agricultural work. SECTION 2.  Section 27-19-141, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-141.  In case any person, other than a dealer or agent, shall sell, assign or transfer any vehicle to another person, the person acquiring such vehicle shall register the vehicle with the county tax collector of his residence or the * * *State TaxCommission Department of Revenue within seven (7) working days after such sale, assignment or transfer and pay the annual privilege license taxes.  The seller or transferor shall remove the license plate from the vehicle and retain same.  Such license plate must be surrendered to the issuing authority with the corresponding tax receipt if required, or retained by the seller or transferor as authorized herein, and credit shall be allowed for the taxes paid for the remaining tax year on like privilege or ad valorem taxes due on another vehicle owned by the seller or transferor, or by the seller's or transferor's spouse or dependent child.  In lieu of surrendering the license plate to the issuing authority, the seller or transferor may retain and use the license plate on another vehicle that is to be registered by such person for the first time if (a) the license plate is of the same series as that of a new license plate required for such vehicle that is to be registered, (b) the license plate removed from the vehicle is authorized for use on the type of vehicle to be registered and (c) the county in which the license plate was issued is the same as the county in which the vehicle is to be registered.  Privilege taxes on vehicles registered in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, apportioned vehicles, rental and commercial trailers and buses, shall be considered like taxes only for vehicles registered in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight, apportioned vehicles, rental and commercial trailers and buses.  Privilege or ad valorem taxes on vehicles with a gross vehicle weight of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or less shall be considered like taxes only for vehicles with a gross vehicle weight of ten thousand (10,000) pounds or less.  If the seller or transferor does not elect to receive such credit at the time the license plate is surrendered or retained for use on another vehicle, the issuing authority shall issue a certificate of credit to the seller or transferor, or to the seller's or transferor's spouse or dependent child, or to any other person, business or corporation, at the direction of the seller or transferor, for the remaining unexpired taxes prorated from the first day of the month following the month in which the license plate is surrendered.  Any credit allowed for taxes due or any certificate of credit issued may be applied to like taxes owed in any county by the person to whom the credit is allowed or by the person possessing the certificate of credit.  No credit, however, shall be allowed on the charge made for registration fees and any tag fees.  Such license plates surrendered to the tax collector shall be retained by him, and in no event shall such license plate be attached to any motor vehicle after being surrendered to the tax collector, nor shall any license plate be transferred from one (1) motor vehicle to any other motor vehicle. Certificates of credit shall be designed and furnished by the commissioner. The credit authorized by this section shall not apply to trailers or semitrailers subject to the tax levied in Section 27-19-18. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.